Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 4
RETURN FROM DEPLOYMENT

14-13.7-401. Procedure for terminating interim grant of custodial responsibility established by agreement.

At any time after return from deployment, an interim agreement granting custodial responsibility under part 2 of this article may be terminated by an agreement to terminate signed by the deploying parent and the other parent.

An interim agreement under part 2 of this article granting custodial responsibility terminates:

If an agreement to terminate under subsection (1) of this section specifies a date for termination on that date; or

If the agreement to terminate does not specify a date, on the date the agreement to terminate is signed by the deploying parent and the other parent.

In the absence of an agreement to terminate under subsection (1) of this section, an interim agreement granting custodial responsibility terminates under part 2 of this article thirty-five days after the deploying parent gives notice to the other parent that the deploying parent returned from deployment.

If an interim agreement granting custodial responsibility was filed with a court pursuant to section 14-13.7-205, an agreement to terminate the interim agreement must also be filed with that court within a reasonable time after the signing of the agreement. The case number and heading of the case concerning custodial responsibility or child support must be provided to the court with the agreement to terminate.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 633, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-402. Consent procedure for terminating interim grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.

At any time after a deploying parent returns from deployment, the deploying parent and the other parent may file with the court an agreement to terminate an interim order for custodial responsibility issued under part 3 of this article. After an agreement has been filed, the court shall issue an order terminating the interim order effective on the date specified in the agreement. If a date is not specified, the order is effective immediately.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 634, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-403. Visitation before termination of interim grant of custodial responsibility.

After a deploying parent returns from deployment until an interim agreement or an interim order for custodial responsibility established under part 2 or 3 of this article is terminated, the court shall immediately issue an interim order granting the deploying parent reasonable contact with the child consistent with the deployed parent's post deployment leave, unless the court finds it is not in the best interest of the child, even if the time of contact exceeds the time the deploying parent spent with the child before deployment.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 634, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-404. Termination by operation of law of interim grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.

If an agreement between the parties to terminate an interim order for custodial responsibility under part 3 of this article has not been filed, the order terminates thirty-five days after the deploying parent gives notice to the other parent and any nonparent granted custodial responsibility that the deploying parent has returned from deployment.

A proceeding seeking to prevent termination of an interim order for custodial responsibility is governed by sections 14-10-124 and 14-10-129.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 634, § 2, effective May 10.